lt-LT: Papildomas projektavimo programinės įrangos tipas: 2D grindų planas; 3D modeliavimas; Išplėstinė realybė; Interjero detalės; Kraštovaizdžio dizainas; Renovacijos planavimas; Virtuali ekskursija; Kita
sv: Typ av ytterligare programvara för design: 2D-planlösning; 3D-modellering; Augmented reality; Heminredning; Landskapsdesign; Renoveringsplanering; Virtuell rundtur; Övrigt
hr-HR: Dodatna vrsta softvera za projektiranje: 2D planiranje prostora; 3D modeliranje; Proširena stvarnost; Uređenje interijera; Dizajn krajobraza; Planiranje renoviranja; Virtualni obilazak; Ostalo
sk-SK: Ďalší typ dizajnérskeho softvéru: 2D plánovanie poschodia; 3D modelovanie; Rozšírená realita; Výzdoba interiéru; Krajinná architektúra; Plánovanie renovácie; Virtuálna prehliadka; Iné
hu: Tervezőszoftver további típusa: 2D alaprajz; 3D modellezés; Kiterjesztett valóság; Belsőépítészet; Tájépítészet; Felújítási tervek; Virtuális séta; Egyéb
pt-PT: Tipo de software de design adicional: Planeamento de piso 2D; Modelação 3D; Realidade aumentada; Decoração de interiores; Projetos paisagísticos; Planeamento de renovação; Excursão virtual; Outro
de: Zusätzlicher Design-Softwaretyp: 2D-Grundriss; 3D-Modellierung; Erweiterte Realität; Innenausstattung; Landschaftsdesign; Sanierungsplanung; Virtuelle Tour; Sonstiges
en: Additional design software type: 2D floor planning; 3D modeling; Augmented reality; Interior decoration; Landscape design; Renovation planning; Virtual tour; Other
ru: Дополнительные функции программного обеспечения для дизайна: 2D-планирование размещения; 3D-моделирование; Дополненная реальность; Внутреннее оформление; Ландшафтный дизайн; Реконструкционное планирование; Виртуальный тур; Другое
bg-BG: Допълнителен тип софтуер за дизайн: 2D планиране на етажите; 3D моделиране; Добавена реалност; Интериорна декорация; Ландшафтен дизайн; Планиране на ремонт; Виртуална разходка; Други
zh-CN: 其他设计软件类型: 2D 平面规划; 3D 建模; 增强现实; 室内装饰; 景观设计; 改造规划; 虚拟游览; 其他
es: Tipo de software de diseño adicional: Planificación de plantas 2D; Modelado 3D; Realidad aumentada; Decoración de interiores; Diseño de paisajes; Planificación de renovación; Tour virtual; Otros
zh-TW: 附加設計軟體類型: 2D 平面圖; 3D 建模; 擴增實境; 室內裝潢; 景觀設計; 裝修規劃; 虛擬導覽; 其他
cs: Další typ designérského softwaru: Půdorysy; 3D modelování; Rozšířená realita; Interiérová dekorace; Návrhy krajin; Plánování renovace; Virtuální prohlídka; Jiné
pt-BR: Tipo de software de design adicional: Planejamento de piso 2D; Modelagem 3d; Realidade aumentada; Decoração de interior; Paisagismo; Planejamento de reforma; Tour virtual; Outro
vi: Loại phần mềm thiết kế bổ sung: Sơ đồ sàn 2D; Tạo mẫu 3D; Thực tế tăng cường; Trang trí nội thất; Thiết kế cảnh quan; Quy hoạch cải tạo; Chuyến tham quan ảo; Khác
ja: 追加の設計ソフトウェアタイプ: 2Dフロアプラン; 3Dモデリング; 拡張現実; 室内装飾; ランドスケープデザイン; リノベーションプラン; バーチャルツアー; その他
tr: Ek tasarım yazılımı türü: 2D kat planlaması; 3D Modelleme; Artırılmış gerçeklik; İç dekorasyon; Peyzaj tasarımı; Yenileme planlaması; Sanal Tur; Diğer
da: Yderligere type af designsoftware: 2D-plantegninger; 3D-modellering; Augmented reality; Indretning; Landskabsdesign; Renoveringsplanlægning; Virtuel rundvisning; Andet
ro-RO: Tip suplimentar software de proiectare: Plan de amplasare 2D; Modelare 3D; Realitatea augmentată; Decorațiuni interioare; Design peisagistic; Planificarea renovărilor; Tur virtual; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta dodatne programske opreme za oblikovanje: 2D tloris; 3D modeliranje; Obogatena resničnost; Notranja oprema; Krajinsko oblikovanje; Načrtovanje prenove; Virtualni ogled; Drugo
el: Πρόσθετος τύπος λογισμικού σχεδιασμού: Δισδιάστατες κατόψεις; Τρισδιάστατη προτυποποίηση; Επαυξημένη πραγματικότητα; Εσωτερική διακόσμηση; Αρχιτεκτονική τοπίου; Σχεδιασμός ανακαινίσεων; Εικονική περιήγηση; Άλλο
fr: Type de logiciel de conception supplémentaire: Planification spatiale 2D; Modélisation 3D; Réalité augmentée; Décoration d’intérieur; Aménagement paysager; Planification de la rénovation; Visite virtuelle; Autre
ko: 추가 설계 소프트웨어 기능: 2D 평면 계획; 3D 모델링; 증강 현실; 인테리어 장식; 조경 설계; 리노베이션 계획; 가상 투어; 기타
nb: Ekstra designprogramvaretype: 2D-plantegning; 3D-modellering; Utvidet virkelighet; Interiørdekorasjon; Landskapsdesign; Renoveringsplanlegging; Virtuell visning; Annet
pl: Dodatkowy typ oprogramowania do projektowania: Planowanie piętra 2D; Modelowanie 3D; Rzeczywistość rozszerzona; Dekoracja wnętrz; Projektowanie krajobrazu; Planowanie renowacji; Prezentacja wirtualna; Inne
it: Tipo di software di progettazione aggiuntivo: Pianificazione del pavimento 2D; Modellazione 3D; Realtà aumentata; Decorazione d'interni; Progettazione del paesaggio; Progettazione della ristrutturazione; Tour virtuale; Altro
th: ประเภทซอฟต์แวร์การออกแบบเพิ่มเติม: การวางผังพื้นแบบ 2 มิติ; การสร้างโมเดล 3 มิติ; ความเป็นจริงเสริม; การตกแต่งภายใน; การออกแบบภูมิทัศน์; การวางผังสำหรับการรีโนเวท; ทัวร์เสมือนจริง; อื่นๆ
nl: Extra type ontwerpsoftware: 2D vloerplanning; 3D-modelleren; Augmented reality; Interieur decoratie; Landschapsontwerp; Renovatieplanning; Virtuele tour; Andere
fi: Lisäsuunnitteluohjelmistotyyppi: 2D-pohjasuunnittelu; 3D-mallinnus; Lisätty todellisuus; Sisustus; Maisemasuunnittelu; Remontin suunnittelu; Virtuaalinen kierros; Muu